Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BOXING FOR YOUTH.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to SIR Boxing to preserve Minnesota's boxing culture through youth boxing programs. new text end